Utah statutes.
70A-9a-621.   Notification of proposal to accept collateral.
(1)  A secured party that desires to accept collateral in full or partial
satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to:
(a)  any person from which the secured party has received, before the debtor
consented to the acceptance, an authenticated notification of a claim of an
interest in the collateral;
(b)  any other secured party or lienholder that, 10 days before the debtor
consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in or other lien on the
collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement that:
(i)  identified the collateral;
(ii)  was indexed under the debtor's name as of that date; and
(iii)  was filed in the office or offices in which to file a financing
statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date; and
(c)  any other secured party that, 10 days before the debtor consented to the
acceptance, held a security interest in the collateral perfected by compliance
with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in Subsection 70A-9a-311(1).
(2)  A secured party that desires to accept collateral in partial satisfaction
of the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to any secondary obligor
in addition to the persons described in Subsection (1).
